Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 5. Collection of Unpaid Wages

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Settlement of back wage claims under § 16(b, c) of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 216(b), (c)), 65 ALR Fed 698.

§ 27-4-501.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this act:

“Employer” means any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, corporation, labor organization, the administrator or executor of the estate of a deceased individual, or the receiver, trustee, or successor of any of the same, employing any person;

“Employee” means any person who, under the usual common law rules applicable in determining the employer-employee relationship, has the status of an employee;

“Wages” means compensation, including fringe benefits, for labor or services rendered by an employee, whether the amount is determined on a time, task, piece, commission, or other basis, but does not include the value of vacation leave accrued at the date of termination if the written policies of the employer provide that accrued vacation is forfeited upon termination of employment and the written policies are acknowledged in writing by the employee;

“Department” means the department of workforce services;

“This act” means W.S.

27-4-501

through

27-4-508

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.18; Laws 1990, ch. 71, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 67, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (a)(iv).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “, but does not include the value of vacation leave accrued at the date of termination if the written policies of the employer provide that accrued vacation is forfeited upon termination of employment and the written policies are acknowledged in writing by the employee;” in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Employee as opposed to independent contractor. —

Wyoming Department of Employment's grant to a former employee his claim for unpaid wages under Wyo. Stat. Ann § 27-4-507(b) and § 27-4-104(b), was proper because he was an employee under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-4-501(a)(ii) as opposed to an independent contractor; there was no written contract, the employee did not bill the employer for his services, and the employer withheld tax deductions from employee's paychecks. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

Court did not err in awarding attorney fees to employee under § 27-4-104(b)

since relocation cost reimbursement is a fringe benefit in accord with subsection (a)(iii) of this section. NL Indus. v. Dill, 769 P.2d 920,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 27-4-502.
Claims for unpaid wages; anti-retaliation.

The department is hereby empowered to take claims for unpaid wages under the provisions of W.S.

27-4-101

and

27-4-104

. The department in taking a claim for unpaid wages as provided for in this act is not to exceed the maximum amount specified in section 507(a)(4) of title 11, United States Code for claims arising out of bankruptcy or two (2) months wages for any claims not arising out of bankruptcy, per employee per wage claim.

It shall be an unlawful employment practice for any employer to discharge, harass, discipline or in any other manner discriminate against any employee because the employee filed a claim for unpaid wages or made any other complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to this act or testified, assisted or participated in any manner in an investigation, proceeding or hearing under this act. Any employer who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be liable for legal or equitable relief as may be appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this act including continued employment, reinstatement, promotion and the payment of wages lost and an additional equal amount as liquidated damages.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.19; Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2020 ch. 140, § 1, effective March 24, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to assignments of wages generally, see §

27-4-110

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see 27-4-501(a)(v).

The 2020 amendment,

added designation (a); in (a), substituted “the maximum amount specified in section 507(a)(4) of title 11, United States Code for claims arising out of bankruptcy” for “the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00),” substituted “for any claims not arising out of bankruptcy” for “, whichever is the greater”; and added (b).

Laws 2020, ch. 140, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Construction with

27-4-104

. —

Since the legislature specifically directs the Wyoming Department of Employment to take claims under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-4-104

and does not limit its authority to subsection (a), the Department is authorized to make awards under subsection (b), as well. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

Provision does not limit claims. —

Wyoming Department of Employment had authority to consider a former employee's claim for unpaid wages because Wyo. Stat. §

27-4-502

does not limit the claims the Department can hear; it simply limits the amount it can award for each claim. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

§ 27-4-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 3, related to jurisdiction to pursue claims under the act.

§ 27-4-504.
Investigation and determination of unpaid wage claims; hearing; orders; collection of unpaid wages.

Upon receipt of a written claim for unpaid wages, the department shall process, investigate and determine the validity of the claim.

If either the employer or employee is aggrieved by the department’s determination, the aggrieved party may request a fair hearing. The aggrieved party must file a written request for hearing within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt of the department’s determination. Upon receipt of a timely submitted request for hearing, the director shall appoint an independent hearing officer to conduct the fair hearing between the employer and employee. The fair hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. The hearing officer’s determination shall constitute the director’s final agency action.

Upon a finding by the hearing officer that the unpaid wage claim is valid and either the time for judicial review has passed or the decision has been affirmed by final judicial review, the department shall order the employer to pay the amount of unpaid wages due. The department’s order is not appealable or subject to judicial review. The department shall, with the assistance of the county attorney, initiate legal proceedings to collect the unpaid wages in the court having jurisdiction based on the total amount of unpaid wages due.

An employer’s failure to comply with a department’s order is punishable by a civil fine not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each day the employer fails to comply with the order.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.21; Laws 1981, ch. 137, § 1; 1990, ch. 71, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1; 2020 ch. 140, § 1, effective March 24, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

in (c), added “in the court having jurisdiction based on the total amount of unpaid wages due” at the end.

Laws 2020, ch. 140, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 27-4-505.
County attorney to assist in collection of unpaid wages.

In suits commenced under this act where the employer failed to comply with the department’s order to pay the unpaid wages due, the department shall refer the matter to the appropriate county attorney for enforcement of the department’s order.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.22; Laws 1981, ch. 137, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 27-4-501(a)(v).

§ 27-4-506.
Limitation on attempts to make payment of wages collected; unclaimed wages.

The department shall attempt for a period of not less than four (4) months from the date of the collection, to make payments of wages collected under this act to the persons entitled to the wages. Wages collected by the department which remain unclaimed for a period of more than four (4) months from the date of collection, shall be unclaimed property for purposes of W.S.

34-24-101

through

34-24-140

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.23; Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see 27-4-501(a)(v).

§ 27-4-507.
Tips and gratuities; unlawful to pay lower wage than that agreed upon; unlawful to fraudulently fail to pay fringe benefits agreed upon.

Tips and gratuities received by an employee or employees shall be the sole property of such employee or employees and not payable in whole or in part to the employer or any other person.

It shall be unlawful for any employer to pay to any employee a lower wage, salary, or compensation than that provided for or agreed upon by (1) a collective bargaining agreement; (2) a contract between the employer and employee. In no event shall a collective bargaining agreement or a contract provide for compensation lower than any applicable existing statute of this state.

Whenever an employer has agreed with any employee or his agent to provide or make payments to a health or welfare fund, pension fund, vacation plan, apprenticeship program, or other such employment benefits, it shall be unlawful for said employer to willfully, or with intent to defraud, fail to make the payments required by the terms of any such agreement.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.24.

Cross references. —

As to minimum wages with respect to “tip employees,” see §

27-4-202

.

Construction. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

27-4-507

and 27-4-104(b), read in pari materia, synthesize the common purpose and intent regarding collection of unpaid wages; pursuant to §

27-4-507

an employer must fully pay the wages provided by contract, and pursuant to 27-4-104(b) an employee who establishes the amount of unpaid wages justly due is entitled to 18 percent interest, attorney fees, and all costs of suit. Jensen v. Fremont Motors Cody, Inc., 2002 WY 173, 58 P.3d 322,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2002).

Unpaid wages due. —

Wyoming Department of Employment's grant to a former employee his claim for unpaid wages under Wyo. Stat. Ann § 27-4-507(b) and § 27-4-104(b), was proper because under he was an employee under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-4-501(a)(ii) as opposed to an independent contractor; there was no written contract, the employee did not bill the employer for his services, and the employer withheld tax deductions from employee's paychecks. Diamond B Servs. v. Rohde, 2005 WY 130, 120 P.3d 1031,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. Nov. 2, 2005).

§ 27-4-508.
Agreements for reciprocal enforcement; of claim to another state.

The department is hereby empowered to enter into agreements with agencies of other states or the federal government for the reciprocal enforcement and collection of wage claims if those states have a statute authorizing the same.

In the event the department has taken a wage claim for collection and the employer against which the claim has been filed has moved to another state, the department may refer the claim with the written approval of the employee to the proper agency of the other state for collection, provided that there is in existence at the time a reciprocal agreement with the state for the collection of claims. The department is also authorized to accept claims from other states for collection of wages from employers who have removed to Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 156, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-210.25; Laws 2001, ch. 162, § 1.